Washington statutes.
RCW 4.04.010

Extent to which common law prevails.

The common law, so far as it is not inconsistent with the Constitution and laws of the United States, or of the state of Washington nor incompatible with the institutions and condition of society in this state, shall be the rule of decision in all the courts of this state.

[ 1891 c 17 s 1; Code 1881 s 1; 1877 p 3 s 1; 1862 p 83 s 1; RRS s 143. Formerly RCW 1.12.030.]